District of Columbia statutes.
7-2504.04

Duties of licensed dealers; records required.

(a)

Each person holding a dealer’s license, in addition to any other requirements imposed by this unit, the acts of Congress, and other law, shall:

(1)

Display the dealer’s license in a conspicuous place on the premises;

(2)

Notify the Chief in writing:

(A)

Of the loss, theft, or destruction of the dealer’s license (including the circumstances, if known) immediately upon the discovery of such loss, theft, or destruction or of the loss, theft, or destruction of any firearms or ammunition in the dealer’s inventory;

(B)

Of a change in any of the information appearing on the dealer’s license or required by § 7-2504.02 immediately upon the occurrence of any such change;

(3)

Keep at the premises identified in the dealer’s license a true and current record in book form of:

(A)

The name, address, home phone, and date of birth of each employee handling firearms, ammunition, or destructive devices;

(B)

Each firearm or destructive device received into inventory or for repair including the:

(i)

Serial number, caliber, make, model, manufacturer’s number (if any), dealer’s identification number (if any), registration certificate number (if any) of the firearm, and similar descriptive information for destructive devices;

(ii)

Name, address, and dealer’s license number (if any) of the person or organization from whom the firearm or destructive device was purchased or otherwise received;

(iii)

Consideration given for the firearm or destructive device, if any;

(iv)

Date and time received by the licensee and in the case of repair, returned to the person holding the registration certificate; and

(v)

Nature of the repairs made;

(C)

Each firearm or destructive device sold or transferred including the:

(i)

Serial number, caliber, make, model, manufacturer’s number or dealer’s identification number, and registration certificate number (if any) of the firearm or similar information for destructive devices;

(ii)

Name, address, registration certificate number or license number (if any) of the person or organization to whom transferred;

(iii)

The consideration for transfer; and

(iv)

Time and date of delivery of the firearm or destructive device to the transferee;

(D)

Ammunition received into inventory including the:

(i)

Brand and number of rounds of each caliber or gauge;

(ii)

Name, address, and dealer’s license or registration number (if any) of the person or organization from whom received;

(iii)

Consideration given for the ammunition; and

(iv)

Date and time of the receipt of the ammunition;

(E)

Ammunition sold or transferred including:

(i)

Brand and number of rounds of each caliber or gauge;

(ii)

Name, address and dealer’s license number (if any) of the person or organization to whom sold or transferred;

(iii)

If the purchaser or transferee is not a licensee, the registration certificate number of the firearm for which the ammunition was sold or transferred;

(iv)

The consideration for the sale and transfer; and

(v)

The date and time of sale or transfer.

(b)

The records required by subsection (a) of this section shall upon demand be exhibited during normal business hours to any member of the Metropolitan Police Department. In addition, the records required by subsection (a) of this section shall be submitted upon demand with the dealer’s application for license renewal.

(c)

Each person holding a dealer’s license shall, when required by the Chief in writing, submit on a form and for the periods of time specified, any record information required to be maintained by subsection (a) of this section, and any other information reasonably obtainable therefrom.

Sept. 24, 1976, D.C. Law 1-85, title IV, § 404, 23 DCR 2464
Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-372, § 3(j), 56 DCR 1365
This section is referenced in § 7-2504.05.
1981 Ed., § 6-2344.
1973 Ed., § 6-1844.
D.C. Law 17-372, in subsec. (a)(2)(A), substituted “destruction or of the loss, theft, or destruction of any firearms or ammunition in the dealer’s inventory;” for “destruction;”; and, in subsec. (b), added the second sentence.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(j) of Firearms Registration Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-651, January 6, 2009, 56 DCR 911).